Massachusetts, session 194th, H5090.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding after section 248 the following section:-
Section 249. Upon a family’s entry to a temporary emergency assistance shelter, domestic
violence shelter, substance abuse and recovery shelter or non-emergency assistance shelter,
children ages zero to three years shall be automatically referred for early intervention assessment
within thirty (30) days of entry into shelter, according to department of public health operational
standards. Early intervention services shall be rendered once an evaluation and determination of
need has been established by an early intervention professional.
SECTION 2. The department shall adopt regulations or policies and remove procedural barriers
for the administration of this act within 120 days of the effective date of this act.
of 1